Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4 STATEWIDE DEFINED BENEFIT PLAN
31-31-406. Separate retirement accounts - administration - repeal.

Any member having a separate retirement account who terminates service and at the time of termination has less than five years of credited service or who terminates service and at the time of termination has more than five years of credited service but elects a refund of contributions as provided under section 31-31-404 (1)(a) shall forfeit the entire balance in the member's separate retirement account to the actuarial account.

Any member having a separate retirement account who is retired for disability shall receive the entire balance in the member's separate retirement account in accordance with the member's selection of one of the payment options permitted by subsection (3) of this section or pursuant to rules promulgated by the board that allow members who are eligible to receive retirement benefits to defer receipt of the benefits to the extent permitted under section 401 (a)(9) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", 26 U.S.C. sec. 401 (a)(9), as amended, and the regulations promulgated pursuant to section 401 (a)(9). If the member subsequently returns to work pursuant to section 31-31-805 (2) and had been receiving periodic payments from the member's separate retirement account, such payments shall cease and any remaining balance shall remain in the member's separate retirement account, subject to subsequent distribution in accordance with this section.

If any member having a separate retirement account dies prior to termination, the entire balance in the member's separate retirement account shall be payable to the member's surviving spouse or dependent children in accordance with their selection of one of the payment options permitted by subsection (3) of this section.

Any member retiring pursuant to the provisions of section 31-31-403 or 31-31-404 (2) may elect to receive the balance in the member's separate retirement account in accordance with one of the following payment options:

Option 1: In a lump sum;

Option 2: In periodic installments of a specified and substantially equal amount, payable monthly over a period not to exceed the joint life expectancy of the member and the member's spouse. This maximum period shall be determined under the applicable actuarial tables then being used by the association at the time the initial monthly installment payment becomes payable.

Option 3: In an annuity. The member may choose an annuity payable to the member for life or may choose any of the joint and survivor options permitted by section 31-31-403 (5)(a).

A member may elect to take a distribution of the amount in the member's separate retirement account at any time after the member terminates service and in accordance with the rules adopted by the board. Members terminating service and electing a distribution or partial distribution are no longer eligible to elect a refund of contributions.

The restoration of a member's service credit pursuant to section 31-31-404 (1)(b) shall not entitle the member to reinstatement of any previously forfeited balance in the member's separate retirement account.

Repealed.

The balance in a member's separate retirement account, the member's accumulated contributions to the account, and the earnings on the account shall be paid to the member's estate if the member:

Dies while in active service; and

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2020.)

Does not leave a surviving spouse, dependent child, or designated beneficiary.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2020.)

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 909, § 1, effective May 23; (2) amended, p. 1342, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(2)(a) and (4) amended and (7) added, p. 419, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (6), and (7)(b) amended, p. 742, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2020:

(4) and (7) amended and (6) repealed, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 409, § 6, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(8) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1018.

31-31-407. Adjustment of benefits - repeal.

The benefits payable under the statewide defined benefit plan established by this part 4 may be redetermined effective October 1 each year. If such benefits are redetermined, such redetermined amount shall be payable for the following twelve months. To be eligible for redetermination, such benefits shall have been paid for at least twelve calendar months prior to the effective date of redetermination. Any redetermination of benefits made pursuant to this section shall be in lieu of any other annual cost of living adjustment.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 13, § 1, effective August 5, 2008.)

The cost of the adjustment of benefits provided by this section shall be funded in the same manner as other defined benefits established by this part 4.

Effective October 1, 2008, and each year thereafter, any redetermination of benefits made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be determined by the board in its discretion as a fiduciary of the statewide defined benefit plan after considering the funding level of the plan, the cost of such increase, whether the increase creates an adverse actuarial impact on the plan's ability to fund future benefits, and any other factors the board deems appropriate. The redetermined benefits shall not exceed the greater of:

One hundred three percent of the benefits paid for the prior twelve-month period; or

The benefits paid during the prior twelve-month period multiplied by a fraction using the consumer price index for the immediately preceding calendar year as the numerator and the consumer price index for the calendar year prior to the immediately preceding calendar year as the denominator.

As used in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), the term "consumer price index" means the national consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers prepared by the United States department of labor.

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 910, § 1, effective May 23; (2) amended, p. 1340, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 173, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2008:

(1), (2), and (3) amended and (5) added, p. 13, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

(6) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1010.

31-31-408. Modification of state plan by the board - repeal.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 4, and in addition to the authority granted in part 2 of this article, the board may modify the pension benefits and the age and service requirements for pension benefits set forth in this part 4 with respect to the members of the statewide defined benefit plan if:

The board determines that such modification will maintain or enhance the actuarial soundness, as specified in section 31-31-102 (1), of the plan;

The modification does not require an increase in the employer and member contribution rates established as of January 1, 1980, pursuant to section 31-31-402 or such higher member contribution rate established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1.5) of this section;

The modification does not adversely affect the plan's status as a qualified plan pursuant to the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended;

The modification is approved by sixty-five percent of the active members of the plan who vote in the election proposing the modification;

The modification is approved by more than fifty percent of the employers having active members covered by the plan who vote in the election proposing the modification, each employer to be assigned one vote; except that employers having both active police and fire members in the plan shall be assigned two votes; and

The modification does not adversely affect the pension benefits of retired members.

(1.5) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 4, the board may increase the member contribution rate above the rate established pursuant to section 31-31-402 with respect to the members of the statewide defined benefit plan if the increase:

Does not require an increase in the employer contribution rate established pursuant to section 31-31-402;

Does not adversely affect the plan's status as a qualified plan pursuant to the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended;

Is approved by sixty-five percent of the active members of the plan who vote in the election proposing an increase in the member contribution rate; and

Is approved by more than fifty percent of the employers having active members covered by the plan who vote in the election proposing an increase in the member contribution rate, each employer to be assigned one vote; except that employers having both active police and fire members in the plan shall be assigned two votes.

The increase in the member contribution rate established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) shall be paid from a member's salary and otherwise be treated in the same manner specified in section 31-31-402 (1) for other member contributions for purposes of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended. The increase in the member contribution rate shall not be subject to negotiation for payment by the employer.

The board may eliminate an increase in the member contribution rate established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5) so long as the requirements for an increase set forth in said paragraph (a) are met.

(1.6) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 4, the board may increase the contribution rate above the rate established pursuant to section 31-31-402 with respect to the members and employers of the statewide defined benefit plan if:

The rate of increase is equal for the member and the employer;

The increase does not adversely affect the plan's status as a qualified plan pursuant to the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended;

The increase is approved by sixty-five percent of the active members of the plan who vote in the election proposing an increase in the member contribution rate; and

The increase is approved by more than fifty percent of the employers having active members covered by the plan who vote in the election proposing an increase in the member contribution rate, each employer to be assigned one vote; except that employers having both active police and fire members in the plan shall be assigned two votes.

The increase in the member contribution rate established pursuant to subsection (1.6)(a) of this section shall be paid from a member's salary and otherwise be treated in the same manner specified in section 31-31-402 (1) for other member contributions for purposes of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

The board may eliminate an increase in the member and employer contribution rate established pursuant to subsection (1.6)(a) of this section, so long as the requirements for an increase set forth in subsection (1.6)(a) of this section are met.

In no event shall the board adopt a modification that reduces the statewide defined benefit plan's normal retirement age below that permitted by section 31-31-403 (1)(b).

The board shall adopt rules setting forth the procedures for the member elections required by paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1.5) of this section. Each employer having members in the statewide defined benefit plan shall comply with the procedures established by the board and shall certify the results of any member election to the board as prescribed by the board's rules.

A written copy of the language of any modifications to the statewide defined benefit plan or an increase in the member contribution rate adopted by the board pursuant to this section shall be kept and maintained by the board at its offices and be made available for copying and inspection by any interested party.

If at any time the cost of any modification adopted by the board pursuant to subsection (1) of this section would require an increase in the eight percent employer and eight percent member contributions made pursuant to section 31-31-402 or such higher member contribution rate established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1.5) of this section, the board shall revoke the modification as it applies to active members of the plan. The board may reinstitute the modification at a later date, in its discretion, if reinstituting the modification would not require an increase in the eight percent employer and eight percent member contributions made pursuant to section 31-31-402 or such higher member contribution rate established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1.5) of this section.

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 911, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2010:

(1)(b), (3), (4), and (5) amended and (1.5) added, (SB 10-022), ch. 18, p. 84, § 4, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

IP(1) amended, (HB 12-1031), ch. 68, p. 236, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1)(d), (1)(e), (1.5)(a)(III), and (1.5)(a)(IV) amended, (SB 13-240), ch. 273, p. 1434, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2020:

(1.6) added, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 410, § 7, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(6) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1006.5.

Cross references:

For the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see title 26 of the United States Code.

31-31-409. Qualification requirements - internal revenue code. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 912, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(2)(f), (2)(i), and (2)(j) amended and (2)(k) added, p. 25, § 4, effective March 16.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 192, § 17, effective March 31.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1019.

31-31-410. Purchased or rolled-over service credit - repeal.

A member may be granted service credit upon the qualified transfer of funds from an eligible pension plan for other public employment within the United States not covered by the plan, as may be allowed under rules adopted by the board, subject to all of the following conditions:

The member has at least one year of continuous service credit with the same employer covered by the statewide defined benefit plan;

The member provides documentation that the benefits in the eligible plan were earned based on public employment; and

The member transfers funds to the fire and police pension association at the time and in the manner prescribed by the board. The board shall award service credit to the member in an amount calculated by the board on an actuarially equivalent basis.

(1.5) A member may purchase service credit for other public employment within the United States not covered by the plan, as may be allowed under rules adopted by the board, subject to all of the following conditions:

The member has at least one year of continuous service credit with the same employer covered by the statewide defined benefit plan;

The member provides documentation of the dates of employment not covered by the plan and a record of the salary received;

The member verifies that the member will not receive a benefit from any retirement plan covering such employment and that the service credit to be granted has not vested with that plan, except to the extent otherwise required by federal law; and

The member pays or transfers funds from an eligible account to the fire and police pension association, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the board, to pay for the cost of the service credit, such cost to be calculated by the board on an actuarially equivalent basis.

A member may purchase up to five years of service credit for periods of active duty in the uniformed services of the United States, subject to all of the following conditions:

The member has at least one year of continuous service credit with the same employer covered by the statewide defined benefit plan;

The member provides documentation of the dates of service in the uniformed services of the United States and that the member was honorably discharged from such service or is a discharged LGBT veteran, as defined in section 28-5-100.3;

The member provides certification from the employer that the service is not intervening service covered by the federal "Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994", chapter 43 of title 38, U.S.C., as amended;

The member verifies that the member will not receive a benefit from any retirement plan covering such service and that the service credit to be purchased has not vested with that plan, except to the extent otherwise required by federal law; and

The member pays to the fire and police pension association, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the board, the cost of the service credit purchased, such cost to be calculated by the board on an actuarially equivalent basis.

(2.4) A member may be granted up to five years of service credit upon the qualified transfer of funds from an eligible pension plan, for employment with any private employer in the United States, as may be allowed under the rules adopted by the board, subject to all of the following conditions:

The member has at least five years of continuous service credit with the same employer covered by the statewide defined benefit plan;

The member transfers funds to the fire and police pension association at the time and in the manner prescribed by the board. The board shall award service credit to the member in an amount calculated by the board on an actuarially equivalent basis.

A member may be awarded or purchase service credit pursuant to this subsection (2.4) and subsection (2.5) of this section in an amount that, when combined, does not exceed five years.

(2.5) A member may purchase up to five years of service credit for employment with any private employer in the United States, as may be allowed under rules adopted by the board, subject to all of the following conditions:

The member has at least five years of continuous service credit with the same employer covered by the statewide defined benefit plan;

The member provides documentation of the dates of employment not covered by the plan and a record of the salary received;

The member verifies that the member will not receive a benefit from any retirement plan covering such employment and that the service credit to be granted has not vested with that plan, except to the extent otherwise required by federal law; and

The member pays or transfers funds from an eligible account to the fire and police pension association, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the board, to pay for the cost of the service credit, such cost to be calculated by the board on an actuarially equivalent basis.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2015.)

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 35, § 1, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended and (2.5) added, p. 53, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-025), ch. 7, p. 15, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 177, § 14, effective November 11.

L. 2022:

(4) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Restoration of Honor Act") in SB 21-026, see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

31-31-411. Return to work by participating member after retirement - rules - repeal.

The board may, in its discretion, adopt rules suspending the benefits of a member who participates in the defined benefit system, separates from service, elects a retirement, and subsequently returns to work with an employer who participates in the defined benefit system. Such rules shall indicate whether the member shall earn additional service credit as determined by the plan in which the subsequent employer participates and whether the benefit distribution shall resume at such time as the member subsequently separates from service.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the board may adopt rules that allow a member who has reached normal retirement age and who has separated from service, elected a retirement under the defined benefit system, and subsequently returned to work with an employer who provides benefits under the defined benefit system to:

Continue receiving distribution of the member's retirement benefits; and

Earn additional retirement benefits in an alternate money purchase plan.

Prior to the adoption of any rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the board shall make a finding that such rules are in compliance with section 31-31-204 (3), and that there will be no adverse actuarial impact to the defined benefit system as a result of the implementation of such rules.

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-023), ch. 19, p. 87, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2022:

(4) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

31-31-412. Merger into the statewide retirement plan.

On or about January 1, 2023, the assets and liabilities of the statewide defined benefit plan shall merge into the statewide retirement plan created pursuant to article 31.5 of this title 31.

Statewide defined benefit assets held in the actuarial account pursuant to this part 4 shall be transferred to the lifetime benefits account created pursuant to part 1 of article 31.5 of this title 31.

Stabilization reserve account assets held in separate retirement accounts pursuant to this part 4 shall be transferred to the money purchase account created pursuant to part 1 of article 31.5 of this title 31.

Deferred retirement option plan account assets of the statewide defined benefit plan shall be transferred to the money purchase account created pursuant to part 1 of article 31.5 of this title 31.

All remaining defined benefits and other obligations of the statewide defined benefit plan payable on and after January 1, 2023, shall be paid from the lifetime benefits account of the statewide retirement plan; except that the remaining obligations held in the separate retirement accounts of the statewide defined benefit plan shall be transferred to and be payable from the money purchase component of the statewide retirement. Said obligations shall be paid pursuant to the statutory provisions and rules adopted by the board regarding the statewide retirement plan.

Participation by all members, including retirees, in the statewide defined benefit plan shall terminate upon the merger of the plans and said members shall begin participation in the defined benefit component of the statewide retirement plan. Accumulated service credit and length of service shall be aggregated between the plans.

Immediately after such transfer, the affected member's accrued benefits in the statewide retirement plan shall be equal to the member's accrued benefits immediately before the transfer.

The merger is intended to be consistent with the requirements under section 414(l) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and shall not be considered a plan termination and shall not result in a distributable event.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 304, § 7, effective August 10.